Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.360

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appellate review.

Either party to the proceedings in the superior court may seek appellate review of the decision as any other civil action.

[ 1988 c 202 s 26; 1971 c 81 s 71; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.500. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.58.500, 28.58.500.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.